Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3120.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 31-3-32 and 31-3-64 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled
"Registration of Vehicles" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-32. Expiration of registration.
Every vehicle registration under chapters 3 — 9 of this title and every registration card and
registration plate issued under this chapter shall expire at midnight on the thirty-first (31st) day of
March of each year, except that the director of the department of revenue, division of motor vehicles
shall implement a staggered registration system and a staggered distribution system for fully
reflective plates required to be on all vehicles pursuant to § 31-3-10 and a biennial registration
system for fully reflective plates required to be on all commercial vehicles. Implementation of the
staggered registration system, biennial registration system for commercial vehicles, and
distribution system shall be by rules and regulations promulgated by the director of revenue,
division of motor vehicles. Every registration card and registration plate issued to apportioned
vehicles shall expire on the thirty-first (31st) day of May of each year. A fee for the initial issuance
of fully reflective plates and each reissuance thereafter shall be charged in accordance with § 31-
6-1(a). However, the requirements for the reissue of fully reflective plates shall apply only to those
standard plates described in § 31-3-11 and not to plates authorized by any other section of the
general or public laws. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
31-3-64. Combination plates.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall issue:

(1) For any motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross
weight of eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) or less, plates designated as
“combination” upon application and proper form furnished by the administrator of the division of
motor vehicles to applicants. The combination plates will allow those vehicles to drive for both
commercial and pleasure purposes; or
(2) For any motor vehicle eligible for registration as a commercial vehicle having a gross
weight over eight thousand eight hundred pounds (8,800 lbs.) up to eleven thousand eight hundred
pounds (11,800 lbs.) plates designated as “combination” upon application, proof of ownership of a
camping trailer, fifth-wheel camper trailer, travel trailer, or truck camper as defined in § 31-1-3,
and proper form furnished by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles to applicants. The
combination plates will allow those vehicles to drive for pleasure purposes only.
(b) The fees for commercial vehicles registering for a combination plate shall be identical
to those established for other commercial vehicles of the same weight. A combination registration
transaction shall be considered a change to a new registration classification and not a plate change
transaction. A combination registration shall be renewable on a biennial basis during the month of
March each year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004935
========
LC004935 - Page 2 of 3